Washington statutes.
RCW 1.40.040

Posthumous award.

The state medal of merit may be awarded posthumously to be presented to such representative of the deceased as may be deemed appropriate by the governor or the designees specified in RCW 1.40.030.

[ 1986 c 92 s 4.]